Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 6 Athletic Games on Sunday

41-6-1.
Definitions.

“Amateur athletic game” shall be construed to mean and include any athletic game not included within the meaning of the term “professional athletic game.”

“Athletic game” shall be construed to mean and include any game or exhibition of baseball, football, cricket, golf, tennis, track, or athletic game of a similar character played or held in the open air, and also any game or exhibition of ice polo, hockey, tennis, track, or athletic game of a similar character played or held in rinks or other enclosed buildings; provided, however, that the term shall not be construed to mean and include boxing, sparring, or wrestling matches, nor horse racing, trotting, or motor races.

“Licensing authorities” as used in this chapter shall be construed to mean and include the board or bureau of police commissioners, or the city or town councils of any city or town authorized under the provisions of chapter 22 of title 5 to grant licenses for shows and exhibitions.

“Professional athletic game” shall be construed to mean and include any athletic game for which a charge is made for admission or tickets thereto, or at which a collection is taken, or for which the players receive pay or compensation for their services, or that is managed or conducted for the pay or profit of any person, corporation, or association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1724, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 129, § 18; P.L. 1928, ch. 1154, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 362, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

41-6-1

.

41-6-2.
Authorization of amateur games.

The licensing authorities of any town or city may authorize amateur athletic games to be played or held in a town or city between the hours of noon and six o’clock (6:00) in the afternoon of the first day of the week upon such premises and subject to such rules and regulations for the preservation of good order and the prevention of disturbances, as the licensing authorities may prescribe and determine in their discretion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1724, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 129, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 362, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

41-6-2

.

41-6-3.
Professional games permissible by license.

Professional athletic games, except ice polo and hockey, may be played and held in any city or town on the first day of the week under a license therefor issued by the licensing authorities of the town or city in the manner designated under this chapter; provided, however, that the bureau of licenses of the city of Providence may license ice polo and hockey to be played or held in rinks or other enclosed buildings on the first day of the week.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1724, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 129, § 20; P.L. 1928, ch. 1154, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 362, § 20; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2721, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

41-6-3

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 149.

41-6-4.
Application for license for professional game.

An application for a license for a professional game shall be made to the licensing authorities by the person proposing to manage or conduct the game, or if the game is to be managed or conducted by a corporation or association, then the application shall be made by some duly authorized officer of the corporation or association. The application shall be in writing, signed by the applicant, and shall be in the form and shall contain the information as the licensing authorities may require, and shall describe with certainty the premises upon which the game is to be held for which a license is desired. The application shall be filed with the licensing authorities and the licensing authorities shall give public notice of the application in a newspaper or newspapers designated by the licensing authorities at least eight (8) days prior to the date upon which the proposed game, or the first of the proposed games, is to be held. The cost of the notice shall be paid to the licensing authorities at the time of filing the application. The application may be for one or more games on certain dates during the season.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1724, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 129, § 20; P.L. 1928, ch. 1154, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 362, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

41-6-4

.

41-6-5.
Issuance or denial of license — Fees.

Except as provided in this chapter, the licensing authorities may approve or reject any application, and if the licensing authorities shall approve any application, they may issue a license for the playing or holding of professional athletic games in accordance therewith on the first day of the week between the hours of one o’clock (1:00 p.m.) in the afternoon and midnight, subject to regulations as the licensing authorities may prescribe for the preservation of good order and the prevention of disturbances. In the case of every license so issued, the licensing authorities shall charge a license fee not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for every single game or exhibition authorized by the license, and in addition thereto, a reasonable sum as the licensing authorities may deem necessary to reimburse the town or city for police services at any game or exhibition so licensed; provided, however, that any professional athletic game, the proceeds of which are to be devoted chiefly to charitable or religious purposes, may in the discretion of the licensing authorities be exempted from paying any license fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1724, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 129, § 20; P.L. 1928, ch. 1154, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 362, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

41-6-5

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 149.

41-6-6.
Objections of neighboring landowners — Proximity to churches.

No license shall be granted under the provisions of this chapter for athletic games to be played in the open air where the owners of the greater part of the land within two hundred feet (200´) of the area or enclosed ground where athletic games are to be played shall make, in writing, a remonstrance to the licensing authorities within six (6) days after the date of the first publication of the notice of the application, or within further time as the licensing authorities may require. No license shall be granted for any area or enclosed ground within five hundred feet (500´) of any church or chapel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1724, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 129, § 21; P.L. 1928, ch. 1154, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 362, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

41-6-6

.

41-6-7.
Revocation of license.

Any license may be revoked by the licensing authorities if, in their judgment, the revocation is necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1919, ch. 1724, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 129, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 362, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

41-6-7

.